Idaho, session 2025, H0339.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature that
only eligible citizens may vote in the United States of America. Addition-
ally, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Secretary of State must
strive to maintain the accuracy and integrity of Idaho's statewide registra-
tion system, ensure that only eligible Idaho voters are registered to vote in
Idaho, and cooperate with other governmental entities to prevent and fight
against voter fraud in the United States. For the sole purpose of achieving
the legislative intent, the Secretary of State shall request, receive, and
utilize data specified in this act.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-433, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 4, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-433, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-433. ACCURACY OF VOTER REGISTRATION INFORMATION. (1) In order to
maintain the accuracy of voter registration records in Idaho:
(a) The following state entities shall furnish to the secretary of
state on or about the twenty-fifth day of each month all data relevant to
determining the accuracy of voter registrations as follows:
(i) The department of health and welfare shall furnish a list-
ing showing the legal name, date of birth, county of residence,
and residence address of each Idaho resident who has died during
the preceding month, and all other data relevant to determining
the accuracy of voter registrations, including but not limited to
age information, social security numbers, driver's license num-
bers, and citizenship information, including United States cus-
toms and immigration services numbers or alien registration num-
bers if available, of any person included in its records;
(ii) The department of transportation shall furnish a listing
showing driver's license and state identification address changes
and new driver's license and state identification issuances, in-
cluding photographs and digital signatures, and all other data


relevant to determining the accuracy of voter registrations,
including but not limited to legal names, dates of birth, age in-
formation, social security numbers, driver's license numbers,
residence addresses, and citizenship information, including
United States customs and immigration services numbers or alien
registration numbers if available, of any person included in its
records; and
(iii) The department of correction shall furnish a listing showing
the legal names, dates of birth, conviction statuses, probation
or parole data, former counties of residence, and former residence
addresses of all offenders in its custody, in addition to all other
data relevant to determining the accuracy of voter registrations,
including but not limited to age information, social security num-
bers, driver's license numbers, residence addresses, and citizen-
ship information, including United States customs and immigration
services numbers or alien registration numbers if available, of
any person in its custody; and
(b) The secretary of state shall:
(i) Annually, but no later than December 31 of each year, re-
quest from the state tax commission a listing showing the legal
names, dates of birth, residence addresses, residence changes,
social security numbers, driver's license numbers, citizenship
statuses, alien registration numbers, and homestead exemption
records of any person included in its records. Once requested, the
tax commission shall furnish such information no later than thirty
(30) days from the date of the request;
(ii) Biannually, but no later than February 1 and July 31 of each
year, request from the federal government any data available
and relevant to assist in ensuring the integrity and accuracy
of Idaho's voter registration information. Such data requested
may include but shall not be limited to legal names, dates of
birth, residence addresses, residence changes, social security
numbers, driver's license numbers, citizenship statuses and ver-
ifications, death records, United States customs and immigration
services numbers, alien registration numbers, and all available
information contained in the systematic alien verification for
entitlements database administered by the United States depart-
ment of homeland security and criminal conviction records;
(iii) On a monthly basis, request from the United States social se-
curity administration any data relevant to assist in ensuring the
integrity and accuracy of voter registration information, includ-
ing but not limited to data available from the help America vote
verification information system maintained by the social security
administration;
(iv) At any time and at the discretion of the secretary of state,
request from the federal government, including but not limited to
the United States department of homeland security, the offices of
the United States attorneys, the social security administration,
and United States postal service, any data available and rele-
vant that would assist in ensuring the integrity of Idaho's voter


registration information, verify voter eligibility, and ver-
ify United States citizenship status, including but not limited
to dates of birth, driver's license numbers, addresses, United
States customs and immigration services numbers, alien registra-
tion numbers, and death records; and
(v) At any time and at the discretion of the secretary of state,
request from any entity, including cities, counties, state enti-
ties, other states, and third-party data providers any informa-
tion that would assist in ensuring the integrity of Idaho's voter
registration information, verify voter eligibility, and ver-
ify United States citizenship status, including dates of birth,
driver's license numbers, addresses, and death records. Entities
located in or subject to the jurisdiction of Idaho subject to the
provisions of this subparagraph shall comply within thirty (30)
days of the secretary of state's request.
(2) The secretary of state may enter into cooperative compacts and
agreements with other states or groups of states to compare voter lists, to
identify individuals who are registered to vote in more than one (1) state,
to maintain the accuracy of voter lists, and to determine the current res-
idence of each such individual to verify such individual's eligibility to
remain registered to vote in Idaho. The secretary of state is authorized
to contract with commercial data providers, including but not limited to
credit agencies and commercial data providers, to assist the secretary of
state's efforts in verifying and auditing information in voter registra-
tion lists, including but not limited to citizenship status and residence;
provided, however, that the secretary of state shall not disseminate sensi-
tive personal data to commercial data providers and credit agencies in its
contracts. All sensitive personal data, such as driver's license numbers,
social security numbers, and dates of birth, shall be protected from public
disclosure except as provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(3)(a) No later than ninety (90) days before a statewide election, the
secretary of state shall review all new voter registration data re-
ceived since the previous statewide election and verify the accuracy
of the new voter registration data by comparing such against the data
provided by the systematic alien verification for entitlements program
operated by the United States department of homeland security.
(b) After completing any comparisons of the information provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the secretary of state shall sort
all statewide voter registration information by county and furnish a
copy of the same to each county clerk along with all relevant informa-
tion concerning voter eligibility of individuals in each county. Each
county clerk shall immediately review the information and initiate can-
cellations of all registrations of individuals reported as deceased or
determined to be ineligible to vote.
(c) The secretary of state and county clerks shall conduct routine re-
views of the voter registration records within the statewide voter reg-
istration system to identify any anomalies, such as duplicate registra-
tions, registrations at business addresses, large numbers of registra-
tions at a single address, and correct districting information.


(4) The secretary of state shall, in conjunction with the county
clerks, make an annual report to the legislature regarding voter registra-
tion maintenance actions performed by them, and provide recommendations to
the legislature to improve and ensure an effective list maintenance process.
(5) The secretary of state shall process voter registration data in a
secured cloud system using cryptography standards consistent with federal
regulations. Voter registration verification requests pursuant to this
section approved by the secretary of state shall be processed on a dedicated
secured system where all access and activity are logged. Data received
and processed by the secretary of state and used for verification purposes
pursuant to this section shall be retained for thirty (30) days or until
properly processed pursuant to the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-270, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-270. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION. (a) Certificates and records in
the custody of the state registrar shall be open to inspection subject to
the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the board, the provisions of
section 74-102, Idaho Code, to the contrary notwithstanding; and it shall
be unlawful for any state or local official or employee under this chapter
to disclose any data contained in the records, except as authorized by this
chapter and the rules of the board.
(b) A complete copy, or any part of a certificate, may be issued to any
applicant who can show direct and tangible interest in the record for which
he applies. A complete copy, or any part of a certificate, shall be issued
upon request or at the direction of the state registrar to a state, federal
or local public agency for child protection and child support enforcement
purposes or for the purpose of investigation of fraud. Subject to such pro-
visions as the board may prescribe, data contained on records may be used
by federal, state or municipal agencies for the purpose of verification of
data.
(c) As provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, data contained on
records may be used for research, public health or statistical purposes. No
lists of registration shall be compiled for public use, except as provided in
section 34-433(2), Idaho Code.
(d) The manner of keeping local records and the use thereof shall be
prescribed by the board, in keeping with the provisions of this section.
(e) When one hundred (100) years have elapsed after the date of birth,
or fifty (50) years have elapsed after the date of death, stillbirth, mar-
riage or divorce, the records of these events in the custody of the state reg-
istrar shall become public records and information shall be made available
in accordance with chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.